Georgia statutes. 
(3) The petition shall be presented to the governing authority of the municipality, which shall refer it to the appropriate municipal departments for review of its sufficiency, reasonableness of assessments, and financial feasibility of the plan. These departments shall submit to the governing authority reports which shall approve of, disapprove of, or give qualified approval with modifications to the district plan, with reasons therefor. The governing authority shall hold a public hearing on the issue of whether such district should be created, provided that notice of the hearing shall be placed in a newspaper of general circulation in the community at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing. The governing authority may approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove the plan; and

(4) Any district plan thus adopted may be amended from time to time or rescinded or its budget may be revised by ordinance.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 4531, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 6.)

36-43-6. Financing of districts.

Statute text

The expense incurred in the provision of supplemental services within a district shall be financed in accordance with the district plan upon which the establishment or extension of the district was based, provided that the cost of supplemental services shall not include the cost to the district of services performed by the municipality on a city-wide basis. Any property tax charges or business license fee and occupation tax surcharges shall be levied and collected in the same manner, at the same time, and by the same officers as other city taxes and assessments.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 4531, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1348, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, § 6.)

36-43-7. Segregation of funds.

Statute text

No charges assessed and collected by a municipality pursuant to this chapter shall be spent for any purpose not authorized by the district plan of the district where such charges were assessed and collected, except for such costs as may be attributed to the billing and collection of such charges.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 4531, § 7.)

36-43-8. Design and rehabilitation standards.

Statute text

Upon the establishment of any district pursuant to this chapter, the governing authority of any municipality to which this chapter is applicable may mandate design and rehabilitation standards for buildings within districts if it finds that such standards are necessary to prevent or eliminate blight, to establish and improve property values, and to foster economic development within districts. The governing authority may establish deadlines for compliance with these standards and may provide for their enforcement.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 4531, § 8.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Standards and requirements for construction, alteration and other modifications of buildings generally, T. 8, C. 2.

Clearance and rehabilitation of blighted areas, T. 8, C. 4.

36-43-9. Termination of districts.

Statute text

Any district which is created or renewed pursuant to Code Section 36-43-5 shall terminate and cease to exist on a date specific no less than five years and no more than ten years from the date of its creation or renewal by ordinance.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 4531, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1209, § 13.)

——————————

CHAPTER 44

REDEVELOPMENT POWERS

Sec.

36-44-1. Short title.

36-44-2. Legislative findings and purpose.

36-44-3. Definitions.

36-44-4. Local legislative bodies serving as redevelopment agency; common redevelopment agency.

36-44-5. Power of political subdivision.

36-44-6. Delegation of powers; limitations on delegation.

36-44-7. Approval of redevelopment plans.

36-44-8. Creation and implementation of tax allocation districts.

36-44-9. Computing tax allocation increments; property tax included; use of tax funds.

36-44-10. Determination of tax allocation increment base of tax allocation district; annual notice.

36-44-11. Positive tax allocation increments.

36-44-12. Termination of tax allocation districts.

36-44-13. Payment of redevelopment costs.

36-44-14. Issuance of tax allocation bonds; authorization of tax allocation notes and other obligations; increasing security and marketability amount; certificate of validation; interest; redevelopment cost anticipation notes.

36-44-15. Determining tax millage rate; no freeze to ad valorem tax millage.

36-44-16. Loans for financing redevelopment costs.

36-44-17. Limitation on creation of tax allocation district.

36-44-18. Application of Urban Redevelopment Law.

36-44-19. Contracting with private individuals or entities.

36-44-20. Requirement of insufficiency.

36-44-21. Public employees and officials prohibited from holding interest disclosures; voidability of prohibited transactions; misconduct in office.

36-44-22. Approval of local law; expansion of authorities by localities prohibited.

36-44-23. Cumulative and supplemental powers.

Annotations

Cross references. - Housing, T. 8, C. 3.

Clearance and rehabilitation of blighted areas, § 8-4-1 et seq.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63, effective April 22, 2009, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and enacted the current chapter. The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 36-44-1 through 36-44-23, relating to redevelopment powers, and was based on Ga. L. 1985, p. 1360, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 967, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1398, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, §§ 7-10; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1209, §§ 1-12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 304, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1051, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 886, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 21/HB 1313; Ga. L. 2006, p. 857, §§ 1-7/HB 1361; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 36/SB 46.

36-44-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Redevelopment Powers Law."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

Annotations

Cross references. - PILOT restriction, § 36-80-16.1.

36-44-2. Legislative findings and purpose.

Statute text

It is found and declared that economically and socially depressed areas exist within counties and municipalities of this state and that these areas contribute to or cause unemployment, limit the tax resources of counties and municipalities, and create a greater demand for governmental services and, in general, have a deleterious effect upon the public health, safety, morals, and welfare. It is, therefore, in the public interest that such areas be redeveloped to the maximum extent practicable to improve economic and social conditions therein in order to abate or eliminate such deleterious effects. To encourage such redevelopment, it is essential that the counties and municipalities of this state have additional powers to form a more effective partnership with private enterprise to overcome economic limitations that have previously impeded or prohibited redevelopment of such areas. It is the purpose of this chapter, therefore, to grant such additional powers to the counties and municipalities of this state, and it is the intention of the General Assembly that this chapter be liberally construed to carry out such purpose.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Use of local school taxes for redevelopment. - School system, development authority, and others were properly granted summary judgment in a suit challenging the allocation of school taxes because the 2008 amendments to Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. VII(b) and O.C.G.A. § 36-44-9(g), governing tax allocation districts, changed the law and retroactively allowed use of local school taxes for general redevelopment purposes. Sherman v. Atlanta Indep. Sch. Sys., 293 Ga. 268, 744 S.E.2d 26 (2013).

36-44-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Ad valorem property taxes" means all ad valorem property taxes levied by each political subdivision and each county and independent board of education consenting to the inclusion of that board of education's property taxes as being applicable to a tax allocation district as provided by Code Section 36-44-9, except:

(A) Those ad valorem property taxes levied to repay bonded indebtedness;

(B) Unless otherwise provided in the resolution creating such district, those ad valorem property taxes levied on personal property or on motor vehicles; and

(C) Unless otherwise provided in the resolution creating such district, those ad valorem property taxes levied on the assessed value of property owned by public utilities and railroad companies, as determined pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 48.

(2) "Area of operation" means, in the case of a municipality or its redevelopment agency, the territory lying within the corporate limits of such municipality; in the case of a county or its redevelopment agency, the territory lying within the unincorporated area of the county; and, in the case of a consolidated government or its redevelopment agency, the area lying within the territorial boundaries of the consolidated government. In the case of a county or its redevelopment agency, such term may also include part or all of the territory within such county lying within the corporate limits of a municipality when authorized by a resolution of the governing authority of such municipality. Such term may also mean the combined areas of operation of political subdivisions which participate in the creation of a common redevelopment agency to serve such participating political subdivisions as provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 36-44-4.

(3) "Local legislative body" means the official or body in which the legislative powers of a political subdivision are vested.

(4) "Political subdivision" means any county, municipality, or consolidated government of this state.

(5) "Redevelopment" means any activity, project, or service necessary or incidental to achieving the development or revitalization of a redevelopment area or a portion thereof designated for redevelopment by a redevelopment plan or the preservation or improvement of historical or natural assets within a redevelopment area or a portion thereof designated for redevelopment by a redevelopment plan. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, redevelopment may include any one or more of the following:

(A) The construction of any building or other facility for use in any business, commercial, industrial, governmental, educational, charitable, or social activity;

(B) The renovation, rehabilitation, reconstruction, remodeling, repair, demolition, alteration, or expansion of any existing building or other facility for use in any business, commercial, industrial, governmental, educational, charitable, or social activity;

(C) The construction, reconstruction, renovation, rehabilitation, remodeling, repair, demolition, alteration, or expansion of public or private housing;

(D) The construction, reconstruction, renovation, rehabilitation, remodeling, repair, demolition, alteration, or expansion of public works or other public facilities necessary or incidental to the provision of governmental services;

(E) The identification, preservation, renovation, rehabilitation, reconstruction, remodeling, repair, demolition, alteration, or restoration of buildings or sites which are of historical significance;

(F) The preservation, protection, renovation, rehabilitation, restoration, alteration, improvement, maintenance, and creation of open spaces, green spaces, or recreational facilities;

(G) The construction, installation, preservation, renovation, rehabilitation, reconstruction, restoration, alteration, improvement, and maintenance of public art and arts and cultural facilities;

(H) The development, construction, reconstruction, repair, demolition, alteration, or expansion of structures, equipment, and facilities for mass transit;

(I) The development, construction, reconstruction, renovation, rehabilitation, repair, demolition, alteration, or expansion of telecommunication infrastructure;

(J) The development, construction, reconstruction, renovation, rehabilitation, repair, demolition, alteration, or expansion of facilities for the improvement of pedestrian access and safety;

(K) Improving or increasing the value of property; and

(L) The acquisition and retention or acquisition and disposition of property for redevelopment purposes or the use for redevelopment purposes of property already owned by a political subdivision or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

(6) "Redevelopment agency" means the local legislative body of a political subdivision or a public body corporate and politic created as the redevelopment agency of the political subdivision or an existing public body corporate and politic designated as the redevelopment agency of the political subdivision pursuant to Code Section 36-44-4.

(7) "Redevelopment area" means an urbanized area as determined by current data from the United States Bureau of the Census or an area presently served by sewer that qualifies as a "blighted or distressed area," a "deteriorating area," or an "area with inadequate infrastructure," as follows:

(A) A "blighted or distressed area" is an area that is experiencing one or more conditions of blight as evidenced by:

(i) The presence of structures, buildings, or improvements that by reason of dilapidation; deterioration; age; obsolescence; inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open space; overcrowding; conditions which endanger life or property by fire or other causes; or any combination of such factors, are conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, high unemployment, juvenile delinquency, or crime and are detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare;

(ii) The presence of a predominant number of substandard, vacant, deteriorated, or deteriorating structures; the predominance of a defective or inadequate street layout or transportation facilities; or faulty lot layout in relation to size, accessibility, or usefulness;

(iii) Evidence of pervasive poverty, defined as being greater than 10 percent of the population in the area as determined by current data from the United States Bureau of the Census, and an unemployment rate that is 10 percent higher than the state average;

(iv) Adverse effects of airport or transportation related noise or environmental contamination or degradation or other adverse environmental factors that the political subdivision has determined to be impairing the redevelopment of the area; or

(v) The existence of conditions through any combination of the foregoing that substantially impair the sound growth of the community and retard the provision of housing accommodations or employment opportunities;

(B) A "deteriorating area" is an area that is experiencing physical or economic decline or stagnation as evidenced by two or more of the following:

(i) The presence of a substantial number of structures or buildings that are 40 years old or older and have no historic significance;

(ii) High commercial or residential vacancies compared to the political subdivision as a whole;

(iii) The predominance of structures or buildings of relatively low value compared to the value of structures or buildings in the surrounding vicinity or significantly slower growth in the property tax digest than is occurring in the political subdivision as a whole;

(iv) Declining or stagnant rents or sales prices compared to the political subdivision as a whole;

(v) In areas where housing exists at present or is determined by the political subdivision to be appropriate after redevelopment, there exists a shortage of safe, decent housing that is not substandard and that is affordable for persons of low and moderate income; or

(vi) Deteriorating or inadequate utility, transportation, or transit infrastructure; and

(C) An "area with inadequate infrastructure" means an area characterized by:

(i) Deteriorating or inadequate parking, roadways, bridges, pedestrian access, or public transportation or transit facilities incapable of handling the volume of traffic into or through the area, either at present or following redevelopment; or

(ii) Deteriorating or inadequate utility infrastructure either at present or following redevelopment.

(8) "Redevelopment costs" means any expenditures made or estimated to be made or monetary obligations incurred or estimated to be incurred to achieve the redevelopment of a redevelopment area or any portion thereof designated by a redevelopment plan or any expenditures made to carry out or exercise any powers granted by this chapter. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, redevelopment costs may include any one or more of the following:

(A) Capital costs, including the costs incurred or estimated to be incurred for the construction of public works or improvements, new buildings, structures, and fixtures, including facilities owned or operated by school districts and systems; the renovation, rehabilitation, reconstruction, remodeling, repair, demolition, alteration, or expansion of existing buildings, structures, and fixtures, including facilities owned or operated by school districts and systems; the acquisition of equipment; and the clearing and grading of land;

(B) Financing costs, including, but not limited to, all necessary and incidental expenses related to the issuance of obligations and which may include payment of interest on any obligations issued under this chapter occurring during the estimated period of construction of any project with respect to which any capital costs within the meaning of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph are financed in whole or in part by such obligations and for a period not to exceed 42 months after completion of any such construction and including reasonable reserves related thereto and all principal and interest paid to holders of evidences of indebtedness issued to pay for other redevelopment costs and any premium paid over the principal amount thereof because of the redemption of such obligations prior to maturity;

(C) Professional service costs, including those costs incurred for architectural, planning, engineering, financial, marketing, and legal advice and services;

(D) Imputed administrative costs, including reasonable charges for the time spent by public employees in connection with the implementation of a redevelopment plan;

(E) Relocation costs as authorized by a redevelopment plan for persons or businesses displaced by the implementation of a redevelopment plan, including but not limited to those relocation payments made following condemnation under Chapter 4 of Title 22, "The Georgia Relocation Assistance and Land Acquisition Policy Act";

(F) Organizational costs, including the costs of conducting environmental impact and other studies, and the costs of informing the public with respect to the creation and implementation of redevelopment plans;

(G) Payments to a political subdivision or board of education in lieu of taxes to compensate for any loss of tax revenues or for any capital costs incurred because of redevelopment activity; provided, however, that any such payments to a political subdivision or board of education shall not exceed in any year the amount of the contribution to the tax allocation increment in that year by such political subdivision or board of education; and

(H) Real property assembly costs.

(9) "Redevelopment plan" means a written plan of redevelopment for a redevelopment area or a designated portion thereof which:

(A) Specifies the boundaries of the proposed redevelopment area;

(B) Explains the grounds for a finding by the local legislative body that the redevelopment area on the whole has not been subject to growth and development through private enterprise and would not reasonably be anticipated to be developed without the approval of the redevelopment plan or that the redevelopment area includes one or more natural, historical, or cultural assets which have not been adequately preserved, protected, or improved and such asset or assets would not reasonably be anticipated to be adequately preserved, protected, or improved without the approval of the redevelopment plan;

(C) Explains the proposed uses after redevelopment of real property within the redevelopment area;

(D) Describes any redevelopment projects within the redevelopment area proposed to be authorized by the redevelopment plan, estimates the cost thereof, and explains the proposed method of financing such projects;

(E) Describes any contracts, agreements, or other instruments creating an obligation for more than one year which are proposed to be entered into by the political subdivision or its redevelopment agency or both for the purpose of implementing the redevelopment plan;

(F) Describes the type of relocation payments proposed to be authorized by the redevelopment plan;

(G) Includes a statement that the proposed redevelopment plan conforms with the local comprehensive plan, master plan, zoning ordinance, and building codes of the political subdivision or explains any exceptions thereto;

(H) Estimates redevelopment costs to be incurred or made during the course of implementing the redevelopment plan;

(I) Recites the last known assessed valuation of the redevelopment area and the estimated assessed valuation after redevelopment;

(J) Provides that property which is to be redeveloped under the plan and which is either designated as a historic property under Article 2 of Chapter 10 of Title 44, the "Georgia Historic Preservation Act," or is listed on or has been determined by any federal agency to be eligible for listing on the National Register of Historic Places will not be:

(i) Substantially altered in any way inconsistent with technical standards for rehabilitation; or

(ii) Demolished unless feasibility for reuse has been evaluated based on technical standards for the review of historic preservation projects,

which technical standards for rehabilitation and review shall be those used by the state historic preservation officer, although nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to require approval of a redevelopment plan or any part thereof by the state historic preservation officer;

(K) Specifies the proposed effective date for the creation of the tax allocation district and the proposed termination date;

(L) Contains a map specifying the boundaries of the proposed tax allocation district and showing existing uses and conditions of real property in the proposed tax allocation district;

(M) Specifies the estimated tax allocation increment base of the proposed tax allocation district;

(N) Specifies ad valorem property taxes for computing tax allocation increments determined in accordance with Code Section 36-44-9 and supported by any resolution required under paragraph (3) of Code Section 36-44-8;

(O) Specifies the amount of the proposed tax allocation bond issue or issues and the term and assumed rate of interest applicable thereto;

(P) Estimates positive tax allocation increments for the period covered by the term of the proposed tax allocation bonds;

(Q) Specifies the property proposed to be pledged for payment or security for payment of tax allocation bonds which property may include positive tax allocation increments derived from the tax allocation district, all or part of general funds derived from the tax allocation district, and any other property from which bonds may be paid under Code Section 36-44-14, subject to the limitations of Code Sections 36-44-9 and 36-44-20;

(R) If the plan proposes to include in the tax allocation increment ad valorem taxes levied by a board of education, the plan shall contain a school system impact analysis addressing the financial and operational impact on the school system of the proposed redevelopment, including but not limited to an estimate of the number of net new public school students that could be anticipated as redevelopment occurs; the location of school facilities within the proposed redevelopment area; an estimate of educational special purpose local option sales taxes projected to be generated by the proposed redevelopment, if any; and a projection of the average value of residential properties resulting from redevelopment compared to current property values in the redevelopment area; and

(S) Includes such other information as may be required by resolution of the political subdivision whose area of operation includes the proposed redevelopment area.

(10) "Resolution" means a resolution or ordinance by which a local legislative body takes official legislative action and any duly adopted amendment thereto.

(11) "Special fund" means the fund provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 36-44-11.

(12) "Tax allocation bonds" means one or more series of bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by a political subdivision to finance, wholly or partly, redevelopment costs within a tax allocation district and which are issued on the basis of pledging for the payment or security for payment of such bonds positive tax allocation increments derived from the tax allocation district, all or part of general funds derived from the tax allocation district, and any other property from which bonds may be paid under Code Section 36-44-14, as determined by the political subdivision subject to the limitations of Code Sections 36-44-9 and 36-44-20. Tax allocation bonds shall not constitute debt within the meaning of Article IX, Section V of the Constitution.

(13) "Tax allocation district" means a contiguous geographic area within a redevelopment area which is defined and created by resolution of the local legislative body of a political subdivision pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of Code Section 36-44-8 for the purpose of issuing tax allocation bonds to finance, wholly or partly, redevelopment costs within the area.

(14) "Tax allocation increment" means that amount obtained by multiplying the total ad valorem property taxes, determined as provided in Code Section 36-44-9, levied within a tax allocation district in any year by a fraction having a numerator equal to that year's taxable value of all taxable property subject to ad valorem property taxes within the tax allocation district minus the tax allocation increment base and a denominator equal to that year's taxable value of all taxable property subject to ad valorem property taxes within the tax allocation district. In any year, a tax allocation increment is "positive" if the tax allocation increment base is less than that year's taxable value of all taxable property subject to ad valorem property taxes and "negative" if such base exceeds such taxable value.

(15) "Tax allocation increment base" means the taxable value of all taxable property subject to ad valorem property taxes, as certified by the state revenue commissioner, located within a tax allocation district on the effective date such district is created pursuant to Code Section 36-44-8.

(16) "Taxable property" means all real and personal property subject to ad valorem taxation by a political subdivision, including property subject to local ad valorem taxation for educational purposes.

(17) "Taxable value" means the current assessed value of taxable property as shown on the tax digest of the county in which the property is located.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 36/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 36/HB 142; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 36/HB 79; Ga. L. 2019, p. 568, § 1/HB 349.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, in paragraph (2), added the second sentence, and substituted "Such term" for "'Area of operation'" at the beginning of the third sentence.

36-44-4. Local legislative bodies serving as redevelopment agency; common redevelopment agency.

Statute text

(a) As an alternative to the creation of a redevelopment agency provided for by subsections (b) through (f) of this Code section, the local legislative body of a political subdivision, by resolution, may designate itself as its respective redevelopment agency and may exercise, within its respective area of operation, the redevelopment powers provided by this chapter.

(b) The local legislative body of a political subdivision may create a public body corporate and politic to serve as its redevelopment agency. Any such public corporation may be created by resolution adopted by the local legislative body of the political subdivision. Such resolution may provide for the membership of the board of directors of such public corporation and their terms of office, for the powers and duties of such public corporation, and for such other matters as may reasonably be necessary and convenient for the creation and activation of such public corporation as the redevelopment agency of the political subdivision.

(c) In the event a political subdivision has activated a public corporation as its "urban redevelopment agency" or designated a housing authority as its "urban redevelopment agency" pursuant to Code Sections 36-61-17 and 36-61-18 of the "Urban Redevelopment Law," the local legislative body of such political subdivision may designate such public corporation as its redevelopment agency for the purposes of this chapter. Any action taken pursuant to the authority of this subsection shall be by resolution duly adopted by the local legislative body of the political subdivision.

(d) Any county, municipality, and consolidated government, or any combination of such political subdivisions, by resolution of their respective local legislative bodies, may jointly create a public corporation, or designate an existing public corporation which already exercises "redevelopment powers" under any other law, to serve as the common redevelopment agency on behalf of such political subdivisions. The membership of the board of directors and their terms of office of any such jointly created public corporation and the powers and duties of such public corporation shall be as mutually agreed upon by the local legislative bodies of the participating political subdivisions, as evidenced by a resolution duly adopted by each such local legislative body. In the event a public corporation is created or designated, as authorized in this Code section, to serve as the common redevelopment agency of two or more political subdivisions, then the area of operation of such redevelopment agency shall be the combined areas of operation of the political subdivisions jointly creating or designating such redevelopment agency.

(e) A political subdivision may participate in the creation or designation of a public corporation to serve as a common redevelopment agency as provided by subsection (d) of this Code section as well as create or designate a public corporation to serve as the redevelopment agency of the political subdivision. In such event, the members of the board of directors of the public corporation created or designated as the redevelopment agency of the political subdivision may also serve, in accordance with the provisions of the resolution of the local legislative body of the political subdivision participating in the creation or designation of a public corporation to serve as a common redevelopment agency, as members of the board of directors of the jointly created public corporation.

(f) For purposes of redevelopment in its downtown area, any municipality may designate a downtown development authority created pursuant to Chapter 42 of this title to serve as a redevelopment agency. Such designation shall not affect any other redevelopment agency that may exist as a part of the municipality. The area of operation of any downtown development agency designated as a redevelopment agency pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the area of operation of the downtown development authority established pursuant to Chapter 42 of this title.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-5. Power of political subdivision.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the limitation of subsection (b) of this Code section, a political subdivision may exercise any powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the power to:

(1) Describe the boundaries of one or more redevelopment areas within its area of operation, but any redevelopment area so described shall conform to the definition of a redevelopment area provided by paragraph (7) of Code Section 36-44-3;

(2) Cause redevelopment plans to be prepared, to approve by resolution the plans, and to implement the provisions and effectuate the purposes of the plans;

(3) Create within redevelopment areas tax allocation districts and define the boundaries thereof or designate an entire redevelopment area as a tax allocation district;

(4) Define the boundaries of portions of a redevelopment area or an entire redevelopment area for the implementation of redevelopment plans other than plans calling for the creation of tax allocation districts;

(5) Issue tax allocation bonds;

(6) Deposit moneys into and disburse moneys from the special fund of any tax allocation district;

(7) Enter into and execute any contracts, leases, mortgages, or other agreements, including agreements with bondholders or lenders, determined by the local legislative body to be necessary or convenient to implement the provisions and effectuate the purposes of redevelopment plans. The contracts or agreements may include conditions, restrictions, or covenants which either run with the land or otherwise regulate the use of land;

(8) Acquire and retain or acquire and dispose of property or interests therein for redevelopment purposes or use or dispose of property or interests therein presently owned by the political subdivision for redevelopment purposes; and any disposition of such property or interests therein may be by public or private sale or lease; and

(9) Exercise, for the purposes of this chapter, any powers conferred upon political subdivisions by Chapter 61 of this title, the "Urban Redevelopment Law."

(b) The powers granted to political subdivisions by subsection (a) of this Code section and by this chapter and any powers delegated to a redevelopment agency pursuant to Code Section 36-44-6 may be exercised only for the purpose of adopting and implementing redevelopment plans, but this limitation shall not be construed to interfere with the exercise of any power now or hereafter possessed by a political subdivision which is granted by any other law.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-6. Delegation of powers; limitations on delegation.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the limitations of subsection (b) of this Code section, the local legislative body of a political subdivision, by resolution, may delegate any of its redevelopment powers to its redevelopment agency created or designated pursuant to Code Section 36-44-4. The local legislative body shall have authority to delegate some or all such powers in such manner and pursuant to such terms and conditions as the local legislative body shall provide by resolution. Any such resolution shall specify any powers delegated to a redevelopment agency, and such resolution may be amended, modified, or repealed by the local legislative body adopting it.

(b) Any delegation of redevelopment powers pursuant to the authority of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be limited by the following requirements:

(1) Any redevelopment plan must be approved by resolution of the local legislative body of the political subdivision as a condition precedent to the implementation of said redevelopment plan, and such approval shall be subject to the requirements of Code Section 36-44-7;

(2) The boundaries of any redevelopment area must be described by resolution of the local legislative body of the political subdivision;

(3) A tax allocation district must be created by resolution of the local legislative body of the political subdivision;

(4) The issuance of any tax allocation bonds shall be by resolution of the local legislative body of the political subdivision;

(5) The power of eminent domain may only be exercised under this chapter by the local legislative body of a political subdivision; and

(6) A local legislative body may not delegate to a redevelopment agency created under subsection (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Code Section 36-44-4 any urban redevelopment project powers except those which may be conferred on an urban redevelopment agency under Code Section 36-61-17 of the "Urban Redevelopment Law."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 36, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2. See County of Butts v. Strahan, 151 Ga. 417 (1921).

36-44-7. Approval of redevelopment plans.

Statute text

(a) A redevelopment plan may be proposed by the redevelopment agency of a political subdivision, but such plan may not be implemented until it is approved by the adoption of a resolution of the local legislative body of the political subdivision as provided in this chapter.

(b) When a proposed redevelopment plan is prepared, it shall be submitted by the redevelopment agency to the local legislative body. Within the 60 day period after the plan is submitted, the local legislative body shall hold at least one public hearing on the proposed redevelopment plan. The local legislative body shall cause the time, date, place, and purpose of each such public hearing to be advertised in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area of operation of the political subdivision at least once during a period of five days immediately preceding the date of each public hearing.

(c) Within 45 days after completing the public hearings required by subsection (b) of this Code section, the local legislative body of the political subdivision shall schedule and hold a meeting of the local legislative body for the purpose of considering the approval of the redevelopment plan. The local legislative body shall cause the date, time, place, and purpose of such meeting to be advertised in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area of operation of the political subdivision at least once during a period of five days immediately preceding the date of such meeting. At such meeting the redevelopment plan shall be approved as submitted, amended and approved, or rejected and returned to the redevelopment agency for further consideration. Any redevelopment plan rejected by the local legislative body shall be returned to the redevelopment agency and shall be subject to the public hearing requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section if it is again submitted to the local legislative body for approval, either in the same or amended form.

(d) Once approved by the local legislative body, a redevelopment plan may be amended only by the local legislative body of the political subdivision. The local legislative body shall cause the date, time, place, and purpose of any meeting of the local legislative body at which an amendment to a redevelopment plan is to be considered to be advertised in the same manner as prescribed by subsection (c) of this Code section for a meeting to consider the adoption of a redevelopment plan.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-8. Creation and implementation of tax allocation districts.

Statute text

In order to create and carry out the purposes of a tax allocation district, the following steps are required:
